Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.050

Procedure when debt not due.

If the debt or demand for which the attachment is sued out is not due at the time of the commencement of the action, the defendant is not required to file any pleadings until the maturity of such debt or demand, but the defendant may, in his or her discretion, do so, and go to trial as early as the cause is reached. No final judgment shall be rendered in such action until the debt or demand upon which it is based becomes due, unless the defendant consents by filing pleadings or otherwise. However, property of a perishable nature may be sold as provided in RCW 6.25.220.

[ 1987 c 442 s 805; 1886 p 40 s 4; RRS s 650. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.040.]